New York, session 2025-2026, A3361.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. A temporary state commission, to be known as the New York 2 state artificial intelligence, robotics and automation commission (here- 3 inafter "commission"), is hereby created to study and make determi- 4 nations on issues including but not limited to: 5 (a) current law within this state addressing artificial intelligence, 6 robotics and automation; 7 (b) comparative state policies that have aided in creating a regulato- 8 ry structure for artificial intelligence, robotics and automation, and 9 whether such measures would be similarly effective in this state; 10 (c) criminal and civil liability regarding violations of law caused by 11 entities equipped with artificial intelligence, robotics and automation; 12 (d) the impact of artificial intelligence, robotics and automation on 13 employment in this state; 14 (e) the impact of artificial intelligence, robotics and automation on 15 the acquiring and disclosure of confidential information; 16 (f) potential restrictions on the use of artificial intelligence, 17 robotics and automation in weaponry; 18 (g) the potential impact on the technology industry of any regulatory 19 measures proposed by this study; and 20 (h) public sector applications of artificial intelligence and cogni- 21 tive technologies. 22 § 2. The commission shall consist of fourteen members to be appointed 23 as follows: five shall be appointed by the governor; two shall be 24 appointed by the temporary president of the senate and one by the minor- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06931-01-5 A. 3361 2 1 ity leader of the senate; two shall be appointed by the speaker of the 2 assembly and one by the minority leader of the assembly; one shall be 3 appointed by the attorney general of the state of New York; one shall be 4 appointed by the chancellor of the state university of New York; and one 5 shall be appointed by the chancellor of the city university of New York. 6 The members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the offi- 7 cial making the appointment of such member. Vacancies in the membership 8 of the commission shall be filled in the manner provided for original 9 appointments. Membership on the commission shall not constitute a public 10 office. A chairperson and vice-chairperson of the commission shall be 11 elected by a majority of its members, all members being present. 12 § 3. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 13 their services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 14 incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this act. 15 § 4. The commission may conduct any hearings or take any written 16 testimony as it deems necessary, and shall take all other steps neces- 17 sary to provide a thorough analysis of all issues related to the 18 provisions listed in section one of this act. 19 § 5. The commission shall issue a final report no later than thirty 20 days prior to the expiration of this act. The commission shall issue its 21 report to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader 22 of the assembly, the temporary president of the senate, and the minority 23 leader of the senate. 24 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 25 deemed repealed December 31, 2026.